Utah statutes.
64-13-30 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Expenses incurred by offenders -- Payment
to department or county jail -- Medical care and copayments.
(1) (a)  The department shall establish and collect from each offender on a
work release program the reasonable costs of the offender's maintenance,
transportation, and incidental expenses incurred by the department on behalf
of the offender.
(b)  Priority shall be given to restitution and family support obligations.
(c)  The offender's reimbursement to the department for the cost of obtaining
the offender's DNA specimen, under Section 53-10-404 is the next priority
after Subsection (1)(b).
(2)  The department, under its rules, may advance funds to any offender as
necessary to establish the offender in a work release program.
(3) (a)  The department or county jail may require an inmate to make a
copayment for medical and dental services provided by the department or county
jail.
(b)  For services provided while in the custody of the department, the
copayment by the inmate is $5 for primary medical care, $5 for dental care,
and $2 for prescription medication.
(c)  For services provided outside of a prison facility while in the custody
of the department, the offender is responsible for 10% of the costs associated
with hospital care with a cap on an inmate's share of hospital care expenses
not to exceed $2,000 per fiscal year.
(4) (a)  An inmate who has assets exceeding $200,000, as determined by the
department upon entry into the department's custody, is responsible to pay the
costs of all medical and dental care up to 20% of the inmate's total
determined asset value.
(b)  After an inmate has received medical and dental care equal to 20% of the
inmate's total asset value, the inmate will be subject to the copayments
provided in Subsection (3).
(5)  The department shall turn over to the Office of State Debt Collection any
debt under this section that is unpaid at the time the offender is released
from parole.
(6)  An inmate may not be denied medical treatment if the inmate is unable to
pay for the treatment because of inadequate financial resources.
